Washington statutes.
RCW 43.950.030

Invalidity of part of title not to affect remainder.

If any provision of this title, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the title, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.198.030. Formerly RCW 43.198.030.]